






Apeel Sciences














 









WE BELIEVE IN ABUNDANCE.

				Apeel Sciences creates edible products from natural plant extracts that allow organic and conventional growers to reduce reliance on pesticides, increase produce quality, and provide superior shelf life.
				 












As the world confronts the implications of an ever-expanding population, agriculture 
				 will need to evolve in order to improve the efficiency with which we use our natural resources.



				In the US, the majority of our fresh water is consumed for irrigation while 40% of our fresh produce is lost to spoilage before it can be used. 
				This means that we are literally "throwing away" a portion of our available freshwater supply, not to mention the added negative environmental 
				consequences of pesticide usage associated with growing the huge fraction of produce that ultimately ends up in landfills.
				

				Our innovative technologies protect crops and help to significantly reduce spoilage, which in turn reduces water use, 
				lowers energy costs, and helps preserve natural ecosystems.
									

				Using agricultural byproducts–parts of the plant that are normally discarded–Apeel creates products that fortify the surfaces of fresh fruits and vegetables, 
				forming an ultra-thin barrier that camouflages crops and shields produce from both biotic and abiotic stressors. 
 
			 
 
				 
















71 South Los Carneros Road
			Goleta, California 93117

 877-926-5184 
 Contact Us
 









© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy 






















Mission, Purpose & Vision | Apeel Sciences














 









 Our Mission
We use our natural plant-based technologies to protect crops and harvested produce, helping to eliminate food spoilage and reduce reliance on chemicals.  

  Our Purpose
Accomplishing our mission means we will waste less food, water and energy, helping to preserve our natural ecosystems while creating economic opportunities for the 500 million small family farms worldwide. 

  Our Vision
In the future, less food will be wasted, we will use smarter, more natural methods for growing and protecting crops, and there will be an abundance of fresh food for everyone.














				Apeel Sciences is committed to being a technological and environmental leader in the agricultural industry, enabling widespread, positive impacts through the development of high-performance pre- and post-harvest products and processes that conserve our precious natural resources and safeguard the Earth's delicate ecological balance.
				










APEEL + THE GATES FOUNDATION
 	 
				A partnership to end hunger and malnutrition
 Read more  »















71 South Los Carneros Road
			Goleta, California 93117

 877-926-5184 
 Contact Us
 









© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy






















Apeel Sciences | Our Technology














 









 Apeel Technology
[ IT'S A 500-MILLION-YEAR-OLD IDEA ] 
The spontaneous organization of lipid molecules into isolated vesicles was a vital step in the evolution of life on earth; 
			semi-permeable lipid membranes provided a cradle in which biochemical reactions could proceed despite harsh external conditions. 
			
			A protective skin, shell or peel of some kind is employed by every form of life on earth. 
			









  THE DREAM 		

How do we  create an invisible, edible "peel" that protects fresh produce naturally?













			Citrus fruits demonstrate the utility of protective 
			coatings for food crops:  fruits with a peel have a 500% longer shelf life than fruits without a peel. 
			

			Shelf life is determined by a combination of biological (e.g., mold) and physiological 
			(e.g., water loss) stressors. The relative severity of these stressors depends on the type of crop
			 and stage along the agricultural value chain.
			
			


			Apeel's technological innovations are based on extracting organic molecules from agricultural byproducts. The molecules are then used to 
			create water-based formulations that coat the surface of fresh produce, forming an ultrathin natural barrier to camouflage more delicate crops 
			 and protect produce from external stressors.
			







  	ECO-LOGIC	 
The goal of the Apeel science team was to create an edible, water-based formula that could be produced from any kind of wasted plant matter. 
			










PROTECTION AGAINST BIOTIC STRESSORS

Biotic stressors include bacteria, fungi and insects. Growers face a diverse array of biotic stressors, 
 and since crop-attacking microbes and insects are ubiquitous in both fields and greenhouses, avoidance is nearly impossible.

These pests can wipe out entire crops and thus drastic preventative measures are employed in order to maintain yields, such as the use of pesticides.

Apeel takes a completely different approach based on recent developments in polymer science. Invisipeel uses a "cloaking" strategy that prevents pests from recognizing the crop as a food source.


Bacteria, fungi, and pests all identify food sources via recognition of specific molecules on produce surfaces. 
 
Our Invisipeel formula camouflages produce surfaces with an ultrathin layer of chemically-contrasting molecules, rendering crops unrecognizable to pests and thus protecting them from bacteria, fungi, and insects.
			


PROTECTION AGAINST ABIOTIC STRESSORS

Abiotic stressors are physical and chemical in nature and include bruising, water loss, and oxidation.

The primary causes of produce spoilage are water loss (transpiration) and exposure to air, which causes oxidation.

Fruits and vegetables eventually wither and shrink as the result of water evaporating out of the plant. Water loss causes the produce to shrink in volume, resulting in poor aesthetic quality and rupture of the produce surface, providing areas of ingress for bacteria and fungi.

Oxidation refers to the reaction of the produce with oxygen, like the browning that occurs on a fresh cut apple surface after a few minutes. On fresh produce, oxidation leads to the development of "off colors" and "off flavors" in the produce.

 See our FAQ page  











Apeel's solutions will help to reduce food waste, provide increased opportunities for family farmers worldwide, and create an abundance of food for everyone on Earth. 
			











71 South Los Carneros Road
			Goleta, California 93117

 877-926-5184 
 Contact Us
 









© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy






















Edipeel  | Apeel Sciences 















 










Postharvest Protection for Organic Growers
Fresher is better.




Imagine a  micro-thin, invisible peel made from plant material that protects the delicate surface of fruit, reducing oxidation and water loss that cause produce to shrivel and lose flavor.

 










 







  
				 Improving the way we preserve our produce will help to conserve tremendous amounts of water, energy 
				 and other agricultural resources while protecting our ecology. 
				  

















[ IT'S NATURE'S IDEA ]




For food, from food.
			Elevated temperatures, bruising, and exposure to the environment all contribute to the spoilage of fruits and vegetables before they reach the consumer. Apeel uses a patented, completely natural method to maintain freshness, reduce reliance on refrigeration,  and reduce the amount of harvested produce lost to spoilage. 
			
A solution for organic farmers 
						 Apeel's products are a natural way to protect food surfaces from environmental stressors to help keep your produce fresher longer without the use of toxic chemicals.
			 
			Invisible protection 
			 Edipeel is entirely invisible, tasteless and edible. When applied to the surface of fruits and vegetables, our unique plant-based formula provides a protective layer that reduces the  
			  oxidation and transpiration that cause produce to wither and become discolored. 
			 

Read our FAQs










APEEL + THE GATES FOUNDATION
 	 
				A partnership to end hunger and malnutrition
 Read more  »















71 South Los Carneros Road
			Goleta, California 93117

 877-926-5184 
 Contact Us
 









© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy 






















Invisipeel | Apeel Sciences














 







Pesticide-Free Farming


 
Since the middle of the 20th century, agriculture has relied heavily on the use of pesticides to protect plants from the damaging influence of weeds, 
disease, bacteria, fungi, and insects. 

 
Although the use of pesticides has had an overwhelmingly positive impact on farming efficiency, there is growing scientific evidence that 
pesticide use has a large number of unintended negative consequences.

 
Traditional pesticides function as cytotoxic agents—poisoning both pathogenic and beneficial bacteria, fungi and insects. 



 
One of the most concerning repercussions of pesticide usage has been its link to declines in honeybee populations. 
Although  efforts have been made to minimize the negative side effects of these chemicals, 
the similarity in cellular metabolism between species makes it incredibly difficult to poison 
one bug without poisoning them all. 

 
 
 As more of these negative environmental and health consequences are brought to light, regulatory agencies 
 will have no choice but to mandate dramatic reductions in pesticide usage. This is already taking place in the EU.
 
 



				Apeel Sciences takes a radically different approach. 
				

 








MOLECULAR CAMOUFLAGE 

	Based on the simple idea that bacteria, fungi, and insects all identify food sources via recognition 
	of specific molecules on produce surfaces, InvisipeelTM works by fortifying 
	these surfaces with an ultra-thin layer of chemically-contrasting molecules, rendering these foods unrecognizable to pests. 









 
Invisipeel "cloaks" the surface of produce with a micro-thin   
			 layer of extracted plant material, convincing insects and fungi that it's not food. 
			











 







  NATURAL.    
 				   INVISIBLE.   
				  EDIBLE.	












 
 
			 Farmers face many crop-devastating pests that can cause significant losses and overall reduction in quality.  Shortly before harvest, fruit crops are especially vulnerable to pests. 
			 

Invisipeel is a proprietary solution created from natural plant extracts that protects 
			against these pre-harvest problems. By applying a micro-thin layer of Invisipeel onto plant surfaces, crops are camouflaged against  these biotic stressors, 
			 providing protection for food crops  with less need for traditional pesticides.
			

			Using Invisipeel for pre-harvest protection will help to increase usable harvest and provide enhanced produce quality, enabling growers to obtain better pricing. 
			

Our Invisipeel formula is currently in the R&D phase and is not yet released for public use.  


Read our FAQs









APEEL + UK AID
 	 
				Supporting worldwide abundance
 Read more  »















71 South Los Carneros Road
			Goleta, California 93117

 877-926-5184 
 Contact Us
 










© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy






















Fresh Sciences  | Apeel's Agricultural News
















 








 FRESH SCIENCES
Agricultural Science News








 July 24, 2017 | ilnews.org
 


Farmers Must Adapt to Changing Weed Species  




Weeds have changed due to farming practices.











 July 24, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Cow Had 8,000% the Legal Limit of Drug  




A US farm failed badly on levels of oxytetracycline, desfuroylceftiofur and flunixin.











 July 24, 2017 | washingtonpost.com
 


10 Mega Myths about Farming  




People spend less of their income on food today, and most farms are family owned.











 July 24, 2017 | greenbiz.com
 


IKEA's 7 Imperatives for Scrapping Food Waste 




Food now represents 5 percent of IKEA's revenue.











 July 24, 2017 | sfchronicle.com
 


MeWe Digitizes Food Safety Inspections 




MeWe's software expedites food safety and compliance checks.











 July 22, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


CDC Targets Yellow Maradol Papayas in Deadly Outbreak




Dozens of people have became infected with deadly Salmonella Kiambu.











 July 21, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Indoor Farming Company Receives $200 Million 




San Francisco-based Plenty has raised $200M in funding led by Softbank.











 July 21, 2017 | agdaily.com
 


USDA Unveiled 244 Made-in-America Inventions in 2016




Made-in-America research excelled in 2016.











 July 21, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Investing in Safe Food




The FDA is awarding $30.9 million to help 43 states become compliant with the Food Safety Modernization Act.











 July 20, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Crop Protection: Biologicals vs Chemicals?




Chemical pesticides are under increasing scrutiny from consumers and regulators.











 July 19, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


Real-Life Plague of Katydids Hits the American West




A Mormon Cricket swarm can destroy entire crops.











 July 18, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


 A Modern Farmer Review of Turnkey Aquaponics Systems




Aquaponics is just beginning to take off at a commercial level. 











 July 17, 2017 | chemistryworld.com
 


3D Printed Flower Blooms when the Sun Comes out 




Scientists created photoresponsive device using shape memory composites.












 July 17, 2017 | peoriapublicradio.org
 


RIPE Program Aims to Combat Effects of Climate Change 




RIPE is engineering plants to more efficiently turn the sun's energy into food.











 July 17, 2017 | acs.org
 


The Hidden Chemistry in Heterogeneous Catalysts




More than 80 percent of  large-scale chemical processes depend on solid catalysts.











 July 17, 2017 | acs.org
 


Periodic Graphics: The Chemistry of Frozen Desserts




The differences between ice cream, gelato, sorbet and frozen yogurt.











 July 17, 2017 | producereport.com
 


Fresh Opportunities in New Technology




Avocados exemplify how innovation drives consumption.











 July 16, 2017 | produceretailer.com
 


Five Tips for a Better Specialty Produce Program




How many once-specialty items  became modern staples. 











 July 14, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Avocados See Record Fourth of July Sales




Sales far surpassed the projection for Independence Day.











 July 14, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Commercial Grasshopper Farm   Raises  Seed Capital




Grasshoppers are difficult to cultivate at scale due to their lengthy incubation period and seasonal breeding.











 July 12, 2017 | produceretailer.com
 



Blue Apron IPO Fizzles — and the Future of Meal Kits





Blue Apron's stock is valued at half what it hoped prior to the IPO.












 July 10, 2017 | civileats.com
 


Should 'Regenerative' Agriculture Get Its Own Label?




Would a new eco-conscious label create more market confusion?











 July 9, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Butter Recalled Because of Listeria 




The Canadian Food Inspection Agency has recalled several brands of butter due to contamination by deadly Listeria monocytogenes.











 July 7, 2017 | acs.org
 


Plants Inspire Exceptionally Strong and Elastic Graphene Aerogels




The new superlight, conductive materials could make better flexible electronics.











 July 7, 2017 | miamiherald.com
 


Missouri Ag Department Orders Temporary Halt to Dicamba Use




A new order immediately ends the use and sales of the herbicide dicamba.

 











 July 7, 2017 | sciencealert.com
 


How You Smell Food Could Change How You Gain Weight 




Smelling food before eating can increase weight gain.











 July 7, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Food Waste Estimates Miss the Mark?




A paper published in the American Journal of Agricultural Economics says food waste figures are overstated.











 July 6, 2017 | californiaagtoday.com
 


Napolitano Says Ag Needs Technology




UC President Janet Napolitano mentions Apeel in her discourse on Agtech.











 July 6, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Study Reveals Shifting Avocado Marketplace




The rise of the fresh perimeter and cross-channel shopping are fueling a new trend.











 July 5, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 



Vinegar — A New Way for Crops to Fight Drought?




A new study finds that vinegar  might help plants survive in drought-like conditions.












 July 3, 2017 | agdaily.com
 


5 Tips for Finding and Landing Your Dream Job in Agriculture	




Internships are worth much more than college credit.











July 3, 2017 | ndtv.com
 


What Do Those Fruit Stickers Tell Us about the Fruits We Buy?




A five-digit number beginning with 8 implies that your fruit was grown with genetic modification.











July 2, 2017 | usatoday.com
 


More Than a Third of Food Is Wasted




Why the US throws away $218 billion worth of food while 1 in 7 Americans are food-insecure.











July 1, 2017 | cnbc.com
 


Food Safety Measures Face Cuts in Trump Budget




The Trump new budget calls for regulatory reform at the FDA.











June 29, 2017 | acs.org
 


How Plants Release Their Fragrant Molecules




Plants actively release volatile organic compounds via protein transporters in cell membranes.











June 29, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 


Study: Controversial Pesticides Can Decimate Honey Bees




Neonicotinoids find their way into pollen and nectar, posing a threat to pollinators.











June 28, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Del Monte to Launch Retail Outlets in the US




New Del Monte stores will offer ready-to-eat products like salads, sandwiches, juices and smoothies.











June 28, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


Three Ways Amazon Is Changing the Grocery Game




Now you can order groceries from your refrigerator.











June 28, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 



EPA Chief Met with Dow CEO before Deciding Not to Ban Dow's Pesticide




The decision not to ban  chlorpyrifos has aroused anger and fear. 












June 26, 2017 | freshplaza.com
 


Walmart Testing Large Kiosks to House Fresh Produce




Wal-Mart's new 24-Hour Online Grocery Pickup fills orders in 60 seconds without human service.











June 26, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Contaminated Food Recalls: Nuts, Chicken, Ravioli and Chick Peas




This week's contaminants include  Listeria, E. coli and foreign material.











June 26, 2017 | chemistryworld.com
 


DDT Surprises with Discovery of Overlooked Form 




DDT and other contact insecticides have long been thought to exist in just one crystal form. 











June 25, 2017 | consumerreports.org
 


Forget the Juice and Eat the Whole Fruit Instead




Juicing removes most of the fiber and its health benefits. 











June 24, 2017 | washingtonpost.com
 


This Quiet Agricultural 'Moonshot' Could Change the Future of Food




How do you tackle the problem of feeding 9 billion people by 2050?











June 21, 2017 | agriculture.com
 


Nearly 40% of Rural Americans Lack Access to High-Speed Internet




In much of America's farmland, four of every 10 people cannot get broadband.











June 21, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Wal-Mart Reports 'Encouraging' Results in Blockchain Pilot




Wal-Mart is working with IBM on Blockchain food traceability. 











June 20, 2017 | acs.org
 


Polymer Network Captures Drinking Water Contaminant




Cross-linked cyclodextrin removes 99% of the perfluorinated chemical PFOA. 











June 20, 2017 | phys.org
 


Could 'Saline Agriculture' Be the Future of Coastal Farming?




Adapting farming techniques to salted soils is a new area of focus for researchers.
 












June 18, 2017 | chemistryworld.com
 


Purest Silicon Sphere Ever Created Will Redefine the Kilogram




The kilogram is the only unit still based on a physical object. 











June 17, 2017 | pbs.org
 


Lead Detected in 20 Percent of Baby Food Samples




Food is the major source of lead exposure in two-thirds of toddlers.











June 16, 2017 | latimes.com
 


Workers Pilfered $300,000 Worth of Avocados




Employees of Mission Produce were caught stealing and selling avocados to unsuspecting customers.











June 16, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Blue Apron: Why IPO and What Does it Mean for Meal Kit Competitors?




Intense competition  has led to  expensive marketing efforts. 











June 16, 2017 | france24.com
 


Modern-Day Slaves: Europe's Fruit Pickers



In Italy, many farm workers are taking orders from the Mafia.











June 15, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Brian Kocher Honored as Produce Man of the Year




Castellini Group CEO Brian Kocher has long been involved in advocating for the industry.











June 14, 2017 | acs.org
 


First CRISPR Crop Could Debut in 2020	




Some hurdles remain before more CRISPR products become available.











June 14, 2017 | sciencealert.com
 


6 Things a Food-Poisoning Expert Refuses to Eat 




Bill Marler simply doesn't eat certain foods anymore.












June 12, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Tons of Food Recalled for Listeria and E. Coli Contamination




Salads, flour, beef and other foods have been recalled due to contamination.











June 11, 2017 | bbc.com
 


Ethiopia's Emergency Food Aid to Run out Next Month




Ethiopia will soon run out of emergency food aid for 7.8 million people.











June 11, 2017 | salon.com
 


What If Several of the World's Biggest Food Crops Failed at the Same Time? 




Examining the effects of major crop losses.











June 10, 2017 | reason.com
 


To Reduce Food Waste, Government Must Get out of the Way




Government waste is still fashionable.











June 9, 2017 | freshplaza.com
 


An Overview of the Global Banana Market 




A status summary of the banana republics.











June 8, 2017 | washingtonpost.com
 


How to Protect against Food Fraud




Food fraud costs the industry billions every year.











June 8, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Freight Farms Raises Series B Round for Shipping Container Tech




Freight Farms has already deployed 100 farms using automation and hydroponic technology.












June 5, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Food Recalls: Contaminated Beef, Tuna, Turkey and Nuts




Found in food: Erectile disfunction drugs, as well as the usual suspects — E. coli, Hepatitis A and Listeria.











June 5, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


The 4 Shocking Consequences of Food Waste




Fruits and vegetables are the most wasted category of food, with 52% going to waste.












June 5, 2017 | acs.org
 


Organic Acids Grow on the Farm




 Short-chain organic acids could replace growth-promoting antibiotics. 












June 2, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Ethylene Filters Help Shippers, Retailers Cut Waste




The filter slows the maturation process, extends shelf life and reduces waste.












June 2, 2017 | telegraph.co.uk
 


Organic Foods Backed by Landmark Report




A new European Parliament report  warns that pesticides are far more dangerous than previously thought.












June 1, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Organic Produce Sales Gain 8.4% 




Organic fruit and vegetable sales increased to $15.6 billion in 2016.












June 1, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


California Attempts to Grow Coffee




Coffee grows best in subtropical and tropical areas.













May 27, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Listeria Claims Organic Nuts, Sausage, Egg Rolls




Numerous products were found to be contaminated with listeria monocytogenes this week.












May 26, 2017 | usda.gov
 


Gypsy Moths Want to Devour Your Favorite Destinations




Gypsy moth caterpillars can defoliate, weaken and kill more than 300 different species of trees and shrubs.












May 26, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Wal-Mart Sees Massive Growth in Online Sales




The world's largest retailer now has more than 50 million items for sale at walmart.com.












May 26, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Sunshine State Avocado Season Looks Promising




15 varieties of Florida avocados are packed under the SlimCado brand.












May 25, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Five Startups Win Accelerator Backing to Fight Food Insecurity




Five startups won backing for solutions that can help reshape our food system.












May 24, 2017 | usnews.com
 


House Approves Bill Seeking to Upend EPA Pesticide Rule 




The measure eliminates the need for permits to spray near rivers and lakes. 












May 24, 2017 | acs.org
 


Sorghum Health Food Sweetener and Now Clothing Dye




New sorghum  dyes hold colorfastness even when washed, rubbed and ironed. 













May 22, 2017 | acs.org
 


New Role in Cells Suggested for ATP




Known as an energy carrier, adenosine triphosphate  can also solubilize proteins.












May 20, 2017 | chicagotribune.com
 


Why Kale Is Everywhere




How food trends are born.












May 20, 2017 | sfgate.com
 


VCs Hunt for Food Delivery Business That's Sustainable




Many meal-delivery businesses have recently closed their doors or cut workers. 












May 19, 2017 | cnn.com
 


This App Is Fighting Food Waste and Offering Free Meals




American households throw food worth $165 billion in the trash each year. 












May 19, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 



You're Not Going to Believe What's in Your Pet's Food 




Many pet foods are chock full of heavy metals, antibiotics and pesticide residues.












May 18, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


Report Says Pests and Pathogens Cost Agriculture Billions 




A new report notes that 1,730 new plant species were discovered in the past year.












May 17, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Kroger Testing New Convenience Store Format




Fresh Eats Market is a new convenience store concept.












May 17, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 


A Gut Bacterial View of Micronutrient Deficiency




Vitamin and mineral (micronutrient) deficiencies afflict 2 billion people. (Abstract)













May 15, 2017 | acs.org
 


Natural Product Analysis Offers Insight on Compound Discovery Trends




The number of natural products discovered has plateaued since the 1990s.












May 13, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Food Recalls: Listeria, Staphylococcus and Antibiotic Residue 




Turkey, ham, waffles, bagged spinach and frozen burritos were contaminated.












May 12, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Food Safety Challenges Loom Large, Experts Say 




Some regulations are complicated for growers.












May 12, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


EPA Reopens Comment Period for Pyrethroids 




The insecticides are  in the EPA registration review process that is required every 15 years.












May 10, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


How Large Food & Beverage Companies Can Engage with Disruptive Technology 




For companies that wish to survive, change is not an option.












May 9, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


New Farming Venture Tweaks Veggies to Suit Needs




A new indoor hydroponic farm is offering 'bespoke' produce. 













May 6, 2017 | fortune.com
 


Aunt Jemima Products Recalled over Listeria Contamination 




Frozen pancakes, waffles, and French toast packages are being recalled.












May 5, 2017 | popsci.com
 


Learning to Farm on Mars Could Actually Save Agriculture on Earth




The fourth planet has no known sources of ready water.












May 5, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Volumes Increasing for South African Citrus




Volumes imported into the US have grown to record shipments of more than 60,000 metric tons.












May 5, 2017 | nationalreview.com
 


How College Students Are Being Misled about 'Sustainable' Agriculture





Sustainability is a reasonable goal, but organic agriculture is no way to achieve it. 












May 5, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


SEC Filing by Dole Reveals Recall Costs			




The 2015-16 listeria outbreak  cost Dole, which recently announced its intention to go public, more than $80 million.












May 4, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


Can Hydroponic Farming Be Organic? 




The battle over the future of "Organic" is getting  heated.












May 3, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Abundant Robotics Raises $10m Series A for Apple Picking Robot




Abundant will use the proceeds to commercialize its first product.












May 3, 2017 | mit.edu
 


Funding Solutions for Pressing Food and Agriculture Issues




Teams tackling crop spoilage, pesticide pollution, and farming efficiency win MIT's Food and Agribusiness Innovation prizes.












May 2, 2017 | sciencedaily.com
 


Agriculture Is Good for Honey Bees, Scientists Say




Hive health is positively correlated to the presence of agriculture. 











Previous Headlines






April 30, 2017 | star2.com
 


The Food Additives That Are in Your Meals




A food additive can be any substance, natural or artificial, that is added to food.












April 28, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


EPA Reviews Put Popular Pesticides under the Magnifying Glass




The EPA reviews each registered pesticide at least every 15 years.












April 28, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Hass Avocado Board Study Reveals Top Spenders




One-quarter of retail grocery shoppers account for 73% of avocado purchases.












April 27, 2017 | winknews.com
 


Food Insecurity Can Affect Your Mental Health




A large worldwide survey points to a link.












April 26, 2017 | chemistryworld.com
 


Perovskite Quantum Dots Boost Artificial Photosynthesis




Perovskite and graphene oxide combined to enhance photocatalytic reduction of carbon dioxide.












April 26, 2017 | capradio.com
 


Bill Aims to Give Minority Farmers a Greater Say in Agriculture 




 A new bill could significantly alter the way the California Department of Food and Agriculture works with farmers of color.












April 25, 2017 | agriculture.com
 


BASF Set to Acquire ZedX




ZedX develops agronomic weather, crop, and pest models.












April 25, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Report: Investing in Small-Scale Agriculture Is 3x More Effective at Reducing Poverty




About 70 percent of people globally get their food from small-scale farmers.













April 23, 2017 | winknews.com
 


Food Recalled Due to Extraneous Golf Ball Materials




Almost anything can end up in your food package.












April 22, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


Vomitoxin Makes Nasty Appearance for US Farm Sector



Vomitoxin produced by fungi is affecting corn, creating headaches for ethanol, pork and poultry markets.












April 21, 2017 | washingtonpost.com
 


USDA Scientists Say Their Work Has Been Tampered with 




Nearly 10 percent OF USDA scientists surveyed said their research has been tampered with or altered by superiors.












April 20, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Wasteless Raises $400k Seed for "Internet of Groceries" Technology




The  Israeli startup is creating a real-time tracking solution to help fight food waste.












April 20, 2017 | usatoday.com
 


Dow Chemical Urges Trump Administration to Ignore Pesticide Findings




Scientists say widely used pesticides are harmful to 1,800  species.












April 20, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


Frozen Vegetables Are Sometimes More Nutritious than Fresh	




A study tested nutrient amounts in fruits vegetables stored three different ways.












April 20, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Pest Problem Expands for Avocado Growers




Additional pests have been shown to transmit the laurel wilt pathogen to avocado groves.












April 20, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


Wal-Mart Seeks Farm Nitrogen Reductions 




Powerhouse produce retailer Wal-Mart issued a challenge to US farmers: cut carbon emissions by 1 gigaton.












April 19, 2017 | acs.org
 


Neonicotinoids Detected in Drinking Water in Agricultural Area




 Studies find neonicotinoids in rivers and streams.












April 19, 2017 | usda.gov
 


2016 Count of Certified Organic Operations Shows Continued Growth 




We now have 24,650 certified organic operations in the US and 37,032 globally.












April 18, 2017 | chemistryworld.com
 


Carbon Puts New Nanostructure under Its Belt




The first carbon nanobelt comprising 12 edge-sharing benzene rings has been made by Japanese researchers.













April 16, 2017 | nhregister.com
 


Quantum Biopower Turns Food Waste into Energy	




The Quantum bio-fuel plant in Southington turns food waste into electricity via methane.












April 14, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


10 Herbicide-Resistant Weed Management Strategies




Two  weed scientists published a paper ranking their weed management strategies. 












April 14, 2017 | nbcnews.com
 


Tiny 'Organ Chips' Promise Big Boost to Testing of Food, Drugs




Each chip is designed to mimic the natural physiology of an organ.












April 14, 2017 | foodandwine.com
 


What to Do If Your Food Goes Bad 




 Not all gone-bad food is for the trash.












April 13, 2017 | eater.com
 


How Coachella Changed the Way Music Festivals Think about Food




Coachella has changed the concert food model.












April 13, 2017 | newyorker.com
 


A Russian Fast-Food Chain Tries Its Luck in America




 In any Russian stolovaya, one can find an array of blini.












April 12, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


 Full Harvest Raises $2m Seed Round for Food Waste Reduction




The  mission is to repurpose  produce  wasted at the farm level.












April 10, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 


Why Even Small Farmers Should Make Space for Refuge Crops




The basic idea of refuge crops is all about bug sex.













April 9, 2017 | etfdailynews.com
 


Agriculture Sector Looks to Finally Bottom




 The agricultural index GKX (Wheat, Corn, Sugar, Soybean, Coffee, Cocoa, Cotton) is back in its bearish area.












April 7, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


USDA to Analyze GE Virus Effect on Greening, Environment




A genetically engineered virus designed to help combat citrus greening will be reviewed.












April 7, 2017 | chemistryworld.com
 


An End to Incorrect NMR Structures?




An adapted protein NMR technique  reveals whether molecular structures are correct. 












April 6, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 



Hunger Amplifies Infectious Diseases for Millions Fleeing Boko Haram




Without treatment, 75,000 more children will die by June.












April 6, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 


Giant Viruses Found in Austria May Be a Fourth Domain of Life




A sewage treatment plant yielded a genome that appears to be from the most cell-like viruses yet. 












April 5, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Vida Fresh Launches Tasti-Lee Tomato Baskets	




Morro Bay, Calif.-based Vida Fresh is the exclusive West Coast grower-packer-shipper of the new vine-ripe packages.












April 5, 2017 | scientificamerican.com
 


3 Big Myths about Modern Agriculture




Myths get in the way of our ability to restore degraded soils that can feed the world using fewer chemicals.












April 5, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


InspiraFarms Plans Cold Storage and Processing in Africa and Central America




The company raised 1.65M Pounds Series A for Cold Storage and Processing Tech.












April 5, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


The Pest Triangle




Pests must be present and the environment must allow it to reach a damaging level before treatment is justified.













April 3, 2017 | phys.com
 


A "Bionic Leaf" Could Help Feed the World




A new kind of leaf uses bacteria, sunlight, water and air to make its own fertilizer.












April 3, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 


Food Recalls: Salmonella, Listeria and E. Coli




Recalls in the past week include ice cream, chili, soy butter, milk and frozen burritos.












April 2, 2017 | sciencenews.org
 


Food Odors Are More Enticing to Sleep-Deprived Brains




Sleep deprivation seems to increase the brain's sensitivity to food smells.












April 1, 2017 | medscape.com
 


Common Pesticides Speed up Puberty  




Researchers have found evidence that exposure to pyrethroids speeds up puberty in boys.












March 31, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


BASF Reaches a Global Licensing Agreement for CRISPR-Cas9




BASF has reached a   licensing agreement with  MIT and Harvard.












March 30, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


EPA Denies Petition to Cancel Chlorpyrifos




The insecticide is used on dozens of crops in nearly 100 countries.












March 29, 2017 | freshfruitportal.com
 


Peru: Sierra Farmers to Take Far Greater Share of Avocado Exports 




Peru's Sierra region will expand from 3,000 hectares  to 17,000 hectares.












March 27, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 


Eating Fruit Fuels Bigger Brains in Primates




Primates that eat fruit show greater brain development than their leaf-eating cousins.













March 26, 2017 | fastcompany.com
 


This Ice Cream Is Made from Food Waste




 A new series of flavors is crafted exclusively from food that otherwise would have ended up in the trash.












March 24, 2017 | npr.org
 


Nobody Wants to Drop Food from a Plane. But It's Happening.




Food from the sky can make the difference between sustenance and starvation.












March 24, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


United Fresh Offers Food Safety Tool for Produce Wholesalers	




The produce association's new guide will assist wholesalers and distributors develop food safety plans.












March 23, 2017 | phys.org
 


Wastewater Cleaned with New   Material Made from Fruit Peels




Heavy metals and organic pollutants can be removed from water using  the peels of oranges and grapefruits.

 












March 23, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


The Biochar Product That's Increasing Crop Yields 14.9%




Cool Planet, the biofuel-turned-biological ag products company, has raised $19.3 million to commercialize.












March 22, 2017 | freshfruitportal.com
 


JV to Begin Planting New Australian-Bred Jumbo Blueberries 




Among the new BerryCo cultivars to be planted  is the Eureka, a high-yielding fruit with 18mm berries.












March 20, 2017 | science.com
 


Watching Plants Grow Has Never Been This Exciting




A new program allows scientists to watch cells growing and splitting in 3D.













March 20, 2017 | agday.org
 


National Ag Day: Tuesday, March 21




This Tuesday is a day to recognize and celebrate the abundance provided by agriculture.












March 20, 2017 | indiatimes.com
 


India: No Imports of Food  with Less than 60% Shelf  Life
 



Imported food items with less than 60 percent of shelf life left will not be allowed to enter Indian market as per the new regulations issued by regulator FSSAI.
 












March 20, 2017 | acs.org
 


Database of Hazardous Reactions Launched




Chemists can use the Chemical Safety Library  to share information about hazardous chemical reactions.












March 18, 2017 | reuters.com
 


Unilever Prepares Sale of Food Brands




The Anglo-Dutch company is planning to sell Flora margarine and Stork butter brands.












March 17, 2017 | sacbee.com
 


Company Recalls 21,000 Pounds of Pizza Sold in CA, NE, UT, WA




Frozen pizzas sold in western US states are being recalled over listeria concerns.
 












March 16, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 



Finding Out What Bees Like Might Be the Key to Saving Them




Bees seem to overwhelmingly 	prefer pollen  from agricultural areas. 












March 16, 2017 | thepacker.com
 


Convenience Continues to Drive Fresh-Cut, Value-Added




In 2016, sales of value-added vegetables increased 9%, just behind value-added fruit at 11% and avocados at 10%.












March 15, 2017 | agprofessional.com
 


Organic Claims Miss Bigger Picture, Study Says 




Benefits of organic production compared to conventional agriculture depend on factors most previous research has overlooked.












March 13, 2017 | civileats.com
 


New UN Report: Pesticides Don't Feed the World




Experts  call for a global treaty to reduce pesticide use.












March 13, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 


Clean Seed's Wireless Smart Seeder Is Set to Disrupt Agriculture




A new crop seeder can deliver different products independently at different rates.













March 13, 2017 | qz.com
 


African-Made Low-Tech Cooling Units




Innovative cooling units  could potentially save billions of dollars of food from waste.












March 13, 2017 | apeelsciences.com
 


California Caviar: Making Finger Limes Stay Fresh Longer




 Finger limes  provide an intriguing garnish for food dishes and drinks.












March 13, 2017 | fruitnet.com
 


Tesco Launches New Food Waste Hotline




A new service will provide another link to help flag up food waste hotspots.












March 13, 2017 | acs.org
 


Bumblebees Leave Foot Odor on Flowers




Chemical signatures enable bees to remember prior landings and distinguish other bees.












March 11, 2017 | npr.org
 


World Faces Largest Humanitarian Crisis Since 1945




Currently more than 20 million people are at immediate risk of starvation.












March 11, 2017 | salon.com
 


Famines in the 21st Century? It's Not for Lack of Food 




What explains the rapid rise in the number of people who need emergency food assistance?












March 10, 2017 | scientificamerican.com
 


Synthetic Yeast Chromosomes Help Probe Mysteries of Evolution




To work out how the genome evolved, bioengineers are recreating it.












March 08, 2017 | ewg.org
 


Strawberries Top the Dirty Dozen List Again




The new Guide to Pesticides in Produce lists the top 48 items with the most pesticide residue.












March 07, 2017 | freshfruitportal.com
 


Innovation: Edipeel Prolongs Fruit Shelf Life, Reduces Spoilage 




Apeel Sciences' new product provides a useful alternative to  fungicides, waxes and chemical preservatives.













March 06, 2017 | hoosieragtoday.com
 


Why Consumers Don't Understand Agriculture




Teaching consumers how their food is produced will not bring them any closer to understanding farmers.












March 04, 2017 | qz.com
 



The Simplest Way to Improve the World's Food Systems Requires No New Science





45 percent of harvested produce is wasted.












March 04, 2017 | reason.com
 


New Study Blames Instagram for Food Waste





Instagramers are most likely to try unusual recipes involving exotic ingredients that are harder to reuse.












March 03, 2017 | bbc.com
 


Why Tomato Is the World's Favoured Fruit





More tomatoes are produced globally than any other fruit.












March 02, 2017 | phys.org
 



A Salt Added to Pesticides Helps Reduce Waste





Adding a certain type of salt to liquid pesticides greatly reduces waste due to splashing.












March 02, 2017 | agriculture.com
 



FarmLogs Launches On-Farm Research Network





The program conducts unbiased research and independent analysis to improve recommendations for growers.













February 27, 2017 | fastcompany.com
 



The 10 Most Innovative Companies In Food 2017





Ten companies that  are changing the way we eat.












February 27, 2017 | phys.org
 



New Tool Gives Apple Farms Hope in Fight against Spring Freezes 


The Cornell Institute for Climate Smart Solutions has developed a new Apple Freeze Risk decision tool.













February 24, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 



Researchers Guilty of Misconduct Won $100M in NIH Grants


For many US researchers judged to have misbehaved, there is such a thing as a second chance.












February 24, 2017 | thepacker.com
 



Wet Winter Slowing California Harvests


California rains are delaying harvest of some strawberries and citrus.












February 24, 2017 | acs.org
 



Computers Predict Molecules' Scent from Their Structures 


		Machine-learning algorithms sniff out compounds' aroma profiles.












February 24, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 



Biologists Propose to Sequence the DNA of All Life on Earth


A small group of researchers have upped the ante on deciphering genomes.












February 23, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 



7 Secrets to Perfect Compost 


Good composting will yield rich, crumbly, earthy-smelling black gold.













February 20, 2017 | kcbx.com
 



Cal Poly: Seeking a Solution to Food Waste 


A new research team was awarded a USDA grant to find food waste solutions from farmers  to consumers.












February 20, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 



The Challenges for Artificial Intelligence in Agriculture


Even within a single field, conditions are always changing from one section to the next. 












February 20, 2017 | compoundchem.com
 



A Brief Guide to the Twenty Common Amino Acids


Of the 500 amino acids found in nature, the human genetic code only directly codes for 20.












February 20, 2017 | curbed.com
 



Food Waste-Fueled Delivery Trucks


Cheaper than diesel fuel, food-based gas  emits around 70 percent less carbon dioxide.












February 20, 2017 | foxnews.com
 



The Common Food Additive that May Be Upsetting Your Stomach


Chronic exposure to titanium dioxide changes digestive cells' structure and function.












February 19, 2017 | sciencemag.com
 



Variety of Bee Species Leads to Juicier Fruits


A variety of pollinators can boost crop yields and naturally control pests.












February 18, 2017 | mic.com
 



GMOs Aren't Scary — Pesticides Are


Chemicals stay in soil and groundwater for decades, potentially endangering generations to come.













February 13, 2017 | foodsafetynews.com
 



Sara Lee, Sargento Cheese Listeria Contamination Recall


A warning was issued in 2010 about Listeria monocytogenes in the facility.












February 13, 2017 | businessinsider.com
 



Whole Foods' Dream Transformed into Its Worst Nightmare


Customers are abandoning Whole Foods as Kroger and Walmart ramp up their organic food offerings.












February 13, 2017 | thefederalist.com
 



How a 'Farm Bust' Could Help Renew American Agriculture


 Soon there will be fewer than two million farms in America. 












February 10, 2017 | medicalnewstoday.com
 



Fruits, Vegetables Boost Psychological Well-Being in 2 Weeks


The benefits of eating fresh produce are not limited to physical health.












February 9, 2017 | modernfarmer.com
 




China Moves To Implement Sustainable Ag Practices


China's plans include organic production, biogas digesters and reducing water usage.












February 9, 2017 | agfundernews.com
 



Why Funding Food and Drink Startups Is So Difficult


Potential investors find it hard to grasp food companies' business propositions. 












February 9, 2017 | sciencedaily.com
 



New Material Cools with Zero Energy Consumption


A new metamaterial can act as a kind of air conditioning system for structures. 












February 7, 2017 | chemistryworld.com
 



Synthetic Cells Pass Turing Test 


Artificial cells have been created that can 'talk' to bacteria.













February 6, 2017 | dw.com
 



German Supermarket Sells Waste Food Only


Saving a quarter of wasted food could feed almost 900 million people. 












February 5, 2017 | allafrica.com
 



Is Africa Really Undergoing a Smallholder Agricultural Revolution?


While overall production in Africa has increased, there's been little at the smallholder level. 












February 3, 2017 | sciencemag.org
 



USDA Blacks out Animal Welfare Information


The USDA has removed public access to tens of thousands of reports. 












February 2, 2017 | thepacker.com
 



Wonderful Citrus Acquires DNE


California-based Wonderful Citrus has acquired DNE World Fruit, DNE International, and the assets of World Pack Cold Storage.












February 1, 2017 | bbc.com
 



Australian Scientists Use Soybean Oil to Create Graphene


Australian scientists have turned ordinary cooking oil into graphene.






















APEEL + UK AID
 	 
				Supporting worldwide abundance
 Read more  »












 
 






© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy 






















A Sunroof, and the Seed of Apeel | Apeel Blog
































				DEC 13, 2016 
				



				by James Rogers, PhD
				








		A SUNROOF, AND THE SEED OF APEEL SCIENCES



Apeel's CEO discusses the company's origins













I promised myself that if I was going to go to grad school—and turn down a well-paying job out of undergrad—then as a consolation, I would buy myself a car with the money I had earned as a summer intern. My only requirement: the car absolutely had to have a sunroof.

I'm very thankful for that sunroof. It meant that my regular trips from Santa Barbara to Lawrence Berkeley National Lab revolved around the sun. Correctly timing my departure meant I could open the sunroof and enjoy the California sunshine for five uninterrupted hours as I drove myself and my samples up to Lawrence Berkeley to conduct my PhD research.

One day as I set out from Santa Barbara, with the music and news programming I had downloaded to keep myself occupied during my drive, I happened to listen to an article about world hunger. Not thinking much of it, I was on to the next track as I gazed out the window and noticed I was completely surrounded by lush green fields. Interesting timing.

The thought occurred to me, "If we are fortunate enough to have these magical seeds you can throw in the ground that passively absorb water and passively absorb sunlight and then produce food (and which, by the way, also self-propagate) ... how are there people on this planet going hungry? How are we screwing this up so badly?" This question gnawed at me for the rest of the drive.


Steel is a combination of iron and carbon atoms which, upon mixing in very particular ratios, results in a structure that is relatively lightweight and high strength. The combination is so important that historians refer to the period in human history following this discovery as "the steel age."
			


When I arrived at the lab I did a quick Web search and learned that in the United States, one-third to one-half of harvested produce ends up in a landfill before it's consumed. This blew my mind. We weren't actually having trouble growing fresh produce. The problem was storing it after it was harvested. Fresh produce is seasonal and perishable, which means it's either feast or famine. OK, I thought, then the real question is, What causes produce to spoil? Thank god for Google: "The leading causes of produce spoilage are water loss and oxidation." That started to ring a bell ...

I did my undergraduate degree in Materials Science and Engineering at Carnegie Mellon University in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, where we studied steel. Steel is a combination of iron and carbon atoms which, upon mixing in very particular ratios, results in a structure that is relatively lightweight and high strength. The combination is so important that historians refer to the period in human history following this discovery as "the steel age."

There's just one problem: iron atoms in a chunk of steel like to react with oxygen in the atmosphere to form iron oxide, or rust, which eats through the metal and limits the lifetime of the steel.

Fortunately, metallurgists discovered a neat trick to solve this problem, by including a small number of sacrificial atoms into a chunk of iron, for example chromium or molybdenum. Those atoms will preferentially diffuse to the surface of the iron and react with oxygen in the atmosphere to form a thin oxide barrier surrounding the outside of the iron. That barrier physically occludes further oxygen from reaching the iron surface, thus preventing rust formation.

So naturally, the question arose, "If iron is confronted by the same challenges as fresh produce, could we solve the problem in the same way: using a thin barrier to protect produce, just this time one not made of steel?"

I talked to a few of my colleagues about the idea. "Sounds like a good idea, bro, but no one wants to eat chemicals." Damn it. This really annoyed me because everything is a chemical; water is a chemical; food is a chemical. Wait, maybe that was it ... I agreed, no one would want to eat "chemicals," but people eat food every day.

I double-majored in Biomedical Engineering as an undergraduate, so I pulled out my old biochemistry textbook to see if there were any suitable barrier-forming materials available in the foods we eat already. Lo and behold, I opened to Chapter 11 and right there, staring me in the face, were all the possible molecules you could ever need to create an edible barrier made entirely of food!

Apeel Sciences was born.

Five years and almost $8 million in research and development later, we're now beginning to realize that vision. Our team has created the first natural, sustainable and scalable way to protect and preserve harvested produce.

Apeel uses the parts of plants and produce that are typically left behind on the farm, like leaves and stems, and repurposes them to create a natural, invisible, edible, tasteless barrier that can be applied to protect food crops, reduce reliance on chemical pesticides, and keep produce as close as possible to its as-picked state. The result is a doubling of the marketable and edible lifespan of fruits and vegetables. And we're just getting started.

Today is a big day for Apeel Sciences. We're excited to share that we've closed a Series B investment of $33 million led by a16z and DBL, and that Vijay Pande, the leader of the Andreessen Horowitz's Bio Fund, and Ira Ehrenpreis, Managing Partner at DBL, are joining our Board of Directors. In addition to the Andreessen and DBL partnership, our Series B was made possible by new and existing partners at some of the most sustainability-focused venture capital firms in existence: Upfront Ventures, Seed2Growth, Powerplant Ventures, and Tao Capital Partners.

I could not possibly be more proud of the incredible scientific advances made by our team, or more optimistic about what the future holds for our company. I feel grateful every day to have the opportunity to work with such talented people to solve such a meaningful problem in the world.

Looking back, I'm reminded of one of the most important things I've ever learned: "It's not important where you start, it's just important that you get started."

—James Rogers, Founder & CEO of Apeel

			






















« Back to where I was

 





























Email 







Apeel will never share your email with anyone, period. 

Apeel will never send spam, only news, articles and updates.

You can easily unsubscribe anytime. 








© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy

















Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version












 
































Apeel Technology Inc, REDDICK STREET, SANTA BARBARA, 93103 | Supplier Report — Panjiva





 












Panjiva

MENU 





Panjiva


Solutions

Buyers
Suppliers
Logistics
Governments
Analysts



Products

Platform
Enterprise
API



Our Data

United States Trade Data
Mexico Trade Data
Brazil Trade Data
Central & South America Data
China Trade Data
Trendspotting
Panjiva Research


Pricing
Search

English


Español 

中文 








Demo Request a Demo 

+1-646-205-0594


Sign in 











Apeel Technology Inc
Company profile made by Panjiva 
 Company profile  Supplier company  United States






        See Apeel Technology Inc's products and customers
      
Thousands of companies like you use Panjiva to research suppliers and competitors.


Sign Up

        1 min video
      






Easy access to trade data



Cleaned and organized Mexico shipments
1 Mexico shipment available for Apeel Technology Inc




Date
Data Source
Customer
Details


2016-12-16
See all 1 mexico shipment for Apeel Technology Inc with Panjiva's Mexico data add-on.Request a DemoorSign Up 


Shipment data shows what products a company is trading and more. Learn more



Quickly analyze trade relationships




Network view map
Explore trading relationships hidden in US import data.
See all 1 customer of Apeel Technology Inc
 Learn more about network view 




Top customers


Jesus Alberto Calderon De L... 






1 customer available
        







Contact information for Apeel Technology Inc


 

Address
REDDICK STREET, SANTA BARBARA, 93103

 


 




           


    


Sample Bill of Lading
1 shipment record available



Bill of Lading Number
6002876


Shipment Date
2016-12-16


Consignee
Jesus Alberto Calderon De La Rosa


Consignee (Original Format)
JESUS ALBERTO CALDERON DE LA ROSA
DEGOLLADO 2019
Nuevo Laredo
Tamaulipas
88240


Consignee Tax Number
CARJ850916EK5


Shipper
Apeel Technology Inc


Shipper (Original Format)
APEEL TECHNOLOGY INC
REDDICK STREET

SANTA BARBARA
93103


Shipper Registration Number
455551038


Shipment Origin
United States


Port of Unlading
Nuevo Laredo (MX)


Port of Unlading (Original Format)
NUEVO LAREDO, NUEVO LAREDO, TAMAULIPAS.


Country of Sale
United States


Transport Method
Truck


Customs Regime
Final Import / Export


Customs Agent
3970


Gross Weight (kg)
158.76


Gross Weight (t)
0.15876


Value of Goods, CIF (USD)
$2,027


Value of Goods, CIF (MXN)
40991.0


Exchange Rate (MXN-USD)
$20


Item Origin
United States


HS Code
84145999


Goods Shipped
SOPLADOR INDUSTRIAL


Shipment Quantity
1.0


Shipment Unit
Pieza


Value of Goods, Item CIF (USD)
$1,672


Value of Goods, Item CIF (MXN)
33812


Shipment Value (MXN)
33812


Tax Quantity
1.0


Tax Unit
Pieza


Customs Processing Tax 1 Value (MXN)
287


Value Added Tax 1 Value (MXN)
5410


Value Added Tax Rate
16.0


WTO Valuation Method Code
1










Thousands of companies use Panjiva to research suppliers and competitors

Sign Up











Solutions
Buyers
Suppliers
Logistics
Governments
Analysts




Products
Platform
Enterprise
API




Data
United States
Mexico
Brazil
Central & South America
China
Panjiva Research
Partners




Company
Leadership Team
Board of Directors
Blog
Press
Contact
Jobs



                20 West 22nd Street, Suite 706New York, NY, 10010 / USA                ‌
Request a demo











English


Español 

中文 






Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Sitemap





© 2017 Panjiva, Inc.







Cart (0) 
Continue Browsing
 







 












Apeel Sciences | Our Technology














 









 Apeel Technology
[ IT'S A 500-MILLION-YEAR-OLD IDEA ] 
The spontaneous organization of lipid molecules into isolated vesicles was a vital step in the evolution of life on earth; 
			semi-permeable lipid membranes provided a cradle in which biochemical reactions could proceed despite harsh external conditions. 
			
			A protective skin, shell or peel of some kind is employed by every form of life on earth. 
			









  THE DREAM 		

How do we  create an invisible, edible "peel" that protects fresh produce naturally?













			Citrus fruits demonstrate the utility of protective 
			coatings for food crops:  fruits with a peel have a 500% longer shelf life than fruits without a peel. 
			

			Shelf life is determined by a combination of biological (e.g., mold) and physiological 
			(e.g., water loss) stressors. The relative severity of these stressors depends on the type of crop
			 and stage along the agricultural value chain.
			
			


			Apeel's technological innovations are based on extracting organic molecules from agricultural byproducts. The molecules are then used to 
			create water-based formulations that coat the surface of fresh produce, forming an ultrathin natural barrier to camouflage more delicate crops 
			 and protect produce from external stressors.
			







  	ECO-LOGIC	 
The goal of the Apeel science team was to create an edible, water-based formula that could be produced from any kind of wasted plant matter. 
			










PROTECTION AGAINST BIOTIC STRESSORS

Biotic stressors include bacteria, fungi and insects. Growers face a diverse array of biotic stressors, 
 and since crop-attacking microbes and insects are ubiquitous in both fields and greenhouses, avoidance is nearly impossible.

These pests can wipe out entire crops and thus drastic preventative measures are employed in order to maintain yields, such as the use of pesticides.

Apeel takes a completely different approach based on recent developments in polymer science. Invisipeel uses a "cloaking" strategy that prevents pests from recognizing the crop as a food source.


Bacteria, fungi, and pests all identify food sources via recognition of specific molecules on produce surfaces. 
 
Our Invisipeel formula camouflages produce surfaces with an ultrathin layer of chemically-contrasting molecules, rendering crops unrecognizable to pests and thus protecting them from bacteria, fungi, and insects.
			


PROTECTION AGAINST ABIOTIC STRESSORS

Abiotic stressors are physical and chemical in nature and include bruising, water loss, and oxidation.

The primary causes of produce spoilage are water loss (transpiration) and exposure to air, which causes oxidation.

Fruits and vegetables eventually wither and shrink as the result of water evaporating out of the plant. Water loss causes the produce to shrink in volume, resulting in poor aesthetic quality and rupture of the produce surface, providing areas of ingress for bacteria and fungi.

Oxidation refers to the reaction of the produce with oxygen, like the browning that occurs on a fresh cut apple surface after a few minutes. On fresh produce, oxidation leads to the development of "off colors" and "off flavors" in the produce.

 See our FAQ page  











Apeel's solutions will help to reduce food waste, provide increased opportunities for family farmers worldwide, and create an abundance of food for everyone on Earth. 
			











71 South Los Carneros Road
			Goleta, California 93117

 877-926-5184 
 Contact Us
 









© Apeel Sciences, Inc.   |   Privacy Policy

















	APEEL Trademark of Apeel Technology, Inc.. Serial Number: 87163256 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Chemical Products
APEEL










 
Get FREE email alerts













APEEL  Trademark Information
 Apeel Technology, Inc.
Chemicals used in industry, science, research; chemicals for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry except fungicides, herbicides, insecticides and parasiticides; biological preparations used in industry, science, research other than for medical or veterinary purposes; biological preparations for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry other than for medical or veterinary purposes; bacteria, bacterial cul...




Perfect for these industries

Chemical Products





Words that describe this mark
chemicals   used   industry      science      research   chemicals   postharvest   use   agriculture      horticulture   forestry   fungicides      herbicides      insecticides   parasiticides   biological   preparations   used   industry      science    
                                    




This is a brand page for the APEEL trademark by Apeel Technology, Inc. 
                                in Goleta, CA, 93117.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this APEEL trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Apeel Technology, Inc. of the APEEL trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the APEEL trademark.
                           


Status Update!
                          On Tuesday, July 18, 2017, status on the APEEL trademark changed to NOTICE OF ALLOWANCE - ISSUED.
                        






On Wednesday, September 7, 2016,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        APEEL by 
                        Apeel Technology, Inc., Goleta, CA  93117.
                        The USPTO has given the APEEL 
                        trademark serial  number of  87163256.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is NOTICE OF ALLOWANCE - ISSUED.
                        The correspondent listed for APEEL is 
                        
                        
                                            LISA GREENWALD-SWIRE of 
                                            FISH & RICHARDSON P.C.,  P.O. BOX 1022, MINNEAPOLIS, MN 55440-1022 
                                .
                            The APEEL trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Chemical Products
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for APEEL 
                            is Chemicals used in industry, science, research; chemicals for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry except fungicides, herbicides, insecticides and parasiticides; biological preparations used in industry, science, research other than for medical or veterinary purposes; biological preparations for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry other than for medical or veterinary purposes; bacteria, bacterial cultures and bacterial preparations for use in industry, science, research other than for medical or veterinary purposes; bacteria, bacterial cultures and bacterial preparations for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry other than for medical or veterinary purposes; post-harvest use agriculture, horticulture and forestry chemical test kits for fruit and vegetable preservation for laboratory or research use, other than for medical or veterinary purposes; chemical substances for post-harvest preservation of foodstuffs or cut flowers; biological preparations for post-harvest preservation of foodstuffs or cut flowers; bacteria, bacterial cultures and bacterial preparations for post-harvest preservation of foodstuffs or cut flowers; chemical coatings for preserving foodstuffs or cut flowers; biological coatings for preserving foodstuffs or cut flowers; coatings made from plant extracts for preserving foodstuffs or cut flowers; soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings on the surfaces of perishable items; edible coatings for extending the shelf life of perishable items; coatings for protecting perishable items from biotic or abiotic stressors; solutions and soluble formulations that can be applied to pre-harvest plants and produce in form of coatings to naturally retard plant respiration and transpiration; molecular coatings for extending the shelf life of cut flowers; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products in order to improve the native functionality or properties of the surfaces, namely, to modify or improve the aesthetic appearance of the surfaces; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products to modify or improve the aesthetic appearance of the surfaces; soluble formulations which may be applied to surfaces of perishable items in form of coatings in order to passivate the surfaces from degradation by biotic stressors; molecular coatings for delaying ripening of produce; food preservatives. 
                            





Word mark:
 APEEL


  Status/Status Date:  


NOTICE OF ALLOWANCE - ISSUED

7/18/2017



  Serial Number:  
87163256


  Filing Date:  
9/7/2016


 Registration Number:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Registration Date:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Goods and Services: 
Chemicals used in industry, science, research; chemicals for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry except fungicides, herbicides, insecticides and parasiticides; biological preparations used in industry, science, research other than for medical or veterinary purposes; biological preparations for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry other than for medical or veterinary purposes; bacteria, bacterial cultures and bacterial preparations for use in industry, science, research other than for medical or veterinary purposes; bacteria, bacterial cultures and bacterial preparations for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry other than for medical or veterinary purposes; post-harvest use agriculture, horticulture and forestry chemical test kits for fruit and vegetable preservation for laboratory or research use, other than for medical or veterinary purposes; chemical substances for post-harvest preservation of foodstuffs or cut flowers; biological preparations for post-harvest preservation of foodstuffs or cut flowers; bacteria, bacterial cultures and bacterial preparations for post-harvest preservation of foodstuffs or cut flowers; chemical coatings for preserving foodstuffs or cut flowers; biological coatings for preserving foodstuffs or cut flowers; coatings made from plant extracts for preserving foodstuffs or cut flowers; soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings on the surfaces of perishable items; edible coatings for extending the shelf life of perishable items; coatings for protecting perishable items from biotic or abiotic stressors; solutions and soluble formulations that can be applied to pre-harvest plants and produce in form of coatings to naturally retard plant respiration and transpiration; molecular coatings for extending the shelf life of cut flowers; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products in order to improve the native functionality or properties of the surfaces, namely, to modify or improve the aesthetic appearance of the surfaces; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products to modify or improve the aesthetic appearance of the surfaces; soluble formulations which may be applied to surfaces of perishable items in form of coatings in order to passivate the surfaces from degradation by biotic stressors; molecular coatings for delaying ripening of produce; food preservatives


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
TradeMark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
5/23/2017


Last Applicant/Owner:

Apeel Technology, Inc.Goleta, CA  93117
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Standard Character Mark


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 (NOT AVAILABLE)


 Correspondent:


LISA GREENWALD-SWIRE
FISH & RICHARDSON P.C.
P.O. BOX 1022
MINNEAPOLIS, MN 55440-1022






 Intent to Use Trademark - Applicant has not submitted proof of use in commerce the the USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (001) - Chemicals used in industry, science and photography, as well as in agriculture, horticulture and forestry; unprocessed artificial resins; unprocessed plastics; manures; fire extinguishing compositions; tempering and soldering preparations; chemical substances for preserving foodstuffs; tanning substances; adhesives used in industry. 


First Use Anywhere: 
Not provided


First Use In Commerce: 
Not provided





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your APEEL trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

7/18/2017
NOTICE OF ALLOWANCE - ISSUED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



LISA GREENWALD-SWIRE


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of APEEL trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search apeel on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for APEEL 




APEEL is providing Chemicals used in industry, science, research; chemicals for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry except fungicides, herbicides, insecticides and parasiticides; biological preparations used in industry, science, research other than for medical or veterinary purposes; biological preparations for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry other than for medical or veterinary purposes; bacteria, bacterial cultures and bacterial preparations for use in indust....
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 






















Apeel Technology, Inc. Trademarks :: Justia Trademarks































































Log In
Sign Up











Find a Lawyer
Ask a Lawyer 
Research the Law
Law Schools
Laws & Regs
Newsletters
Legal Marketing








Apeel Technology, Inc. Trademarks






EDIPEEL

Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions for forming coatings on the surfaces of perishable items,…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 86784339











INVISIPEEL

Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions for protecting perishable items from bacteria, fungi, insects…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 86784341











APEEL SCIENCES

Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 86784342











APEEL SCIENCES

Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 86784343











ORGANIPEEL

Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations composed of naturally occurring plant extracts; food preservatives, namely…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 86914035











Image Trademark

Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations composed of naturally occurring plant extracts; food preservatives, namely…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 86947635











APEEL SCIENCES

Disinfectants, but where intended for agriculture, horticulture or forestry for post-harvest use only; fungicides, but where…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 87122911











APEEL

Disinfectants, but where intended for agriculture, horticulture or forestry for post-harvest use only; fungicides, but where…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 87163223











APEEL

Chemicals used in industry, science, research; chemicals for post-harvest use in agriculture, horticulture and forestry;…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 87163256











APEEL

Agricultural, horticultural and forestry products; fresh fruits and vegetables; natural plants and flowers; cut flowers;…Owned by: Apeel Technology, Inc.Serial Number: 87163263










Today on Verdict



Would a Trump Self-Pardon Precipitate a Constitutional Crisis?



Cornell University law professor Michael C. Dorf argues that if President Trump were to pardon himself, that action itself would not cause a constitutional crisis, but other actions Trump has already taken have already placed us far along a road to a constitutional crisis.





Ask a Lawyer







Question:




Add details
120



Additional Details: 




					    	1000
					    


Ask Question






Find a Lawyer
















Lawyers - Get Listed Now!

Get a free directory profile listing







 



            Justia Legal Resources
        



Find a Lawyer





Bankruptcy Lawyers
Business Lawyers
Criminal Lawyers
Employment Lawyers
Estate Planning Lawyers
Family Lawyers
Personal Injury Lawyers
More... 




Individuals





Bankruptcy
Criminal
Divorce
DUI
Estate Planning
Family Law
Personal Injury
More...




Business





Business Formation
Business Operations
Employment
Intellectual Property
International Trade
Real Estate
Tax Law
More... 




Law Students





Law Schools
Admissions
Financial Aid
Course Outlines
Law Journals
Blogs
Employment
More...




US Federal Law





US Constitution
US Code
Regulations
Supreme Court
Circuit Courts
District Courts
Dockets & Filings
More...




US State Law





State Constitutions
State Codes
State Case Law
California
Florida
New York
Texas
More... 




Other Databases





Legal Blogs
Legal Forms
GAO Reports
Product Recalls
Patents
Trademarks
Countries
More...




Legal Marketing





Websites
Blogs
Content
Social Media
Local Marketing
Paid Ads (CPC/PPC)
Lawyer Directory
More...












 
                    © 2017 Justia



Company
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Help
Marketing Solutions










	APEEL SCIENCES Trademark of Apeel Technology, Inc.. Serial Number: 86784342 :: Trademarkia Trademarks





























































Apply Online!
Attorneys

Services 

U.S. Trademark Registration Service 
International Trademark Registration Service 
Trademark Office Action Response 
Trademark Statement of Use 
Trademark Renewal 
Trademark Assignment 
Trademark Watch 
Trademark Cease & Desist  
Trademark Comprehensive Search  
Copyright Registration 
Patent Services 
Incorporation Services 
Business Page Creation 
 More Services... 


Help
Contact Us


Login






















Trademark Search 
Trademark Category
Chemical Products
APEEL SCIENCES










 
Get FREE email alerts













APEEL SCIENCES  Trademark Information
 Apeel Technology, Inc.
Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings on the surfaces of perishable items, edible coatings for extending the shelf life of perishable items, coatings for protecting perishable items from biotic or abiotic stressors; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products in order to improve the native functionality or properties of th...




Perfect for these industries

Chemical Products





Words that describe this mark
food   preservatives         soluble   formulations   solutions   naturally   occurring   plant   extracts   forming   coatings   surfaces   perishable   items      edible   coatings   extending   shelf   life   perishable   items      coatings    
                                    




This is a brand page for the APEEL SCIENCES trademark by Apeel Technology, Inc. 
                                in Goleta, CA, 93117.
Write a review about a product or service associated with this APEEL SCIENCES trademark.    
                                Or, contact the owner Apeel Technology, Inc. of the APEEL SCIENCES trademark by filing a request to communicate with    
                                the Legal Correspondent for licensing, use, and/or questions related to the APEEL SCIENCES trademark.
                           


Status Update!
                          On Thursday, June 29, 2017, status on the APEEL SCIENCES trademark changed to SECOND EXTENSION - GRANTED.
                        






On Sunday, October 11, 2015,  a U.S. federal trademark registration was filed for 
                        APEEL SCIENCES by 
                        Apeel Technology, Inc., Goleta, CA  93117.
                        The USPTO has given the APEEL SCIENCES 
                        trademark serial  number of  86784342.  
                        The current federal status of this trademark filing is SECOND EXTENSION - GRANTED.
                        The correspondent listed for APEEL SCIENCES is 
                        
                        
                                            LISA GREENWALD-SWIRE of 
                                            Fish & Richardson P C,  500 Arguello St Ste 500, Redwood City, CA 94063-1568 
                                .
                            The APEEL SCIENCES trademark is filed in the category of 
                            
                                    Chemical Products
                                . 
                            The description provided to the USPTO for APEEL SCIENCES 
                            is Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings on the surfaces of perishable items, edible coatings for extending the shelf life of perishable items, coatings for protecting perishable items from biotic or abiotic stressors; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products in order to improve the native functionality or properties of the surfaces, namely, to modify or improve the aesthetic appearance of the surfaces; soluble formulations which may be applied to surfaces of perishable items in order to passivate the surfaces from degradation by biotic stressors, molecular coatings for delaying ripening of produce; flower and plant preservatives, namely, solutions and soluble formulations that can be applied to pre-harvest plants and produce to naturally retard plant respiration and transpiration, and molecular coatings for extending the shelf life of cut flowers. 
                            





Word mark:
 APEEL SCIENCES


  Status/Status Date:  


SECOND EXTENSION - GRANTED

6/29/2017



  Serial Number:  
86784342


  Filing Date:  
10/11/2015


 Registration Number:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Registration Date:  
NOT AVAILABLE


 Goods and Services: 
Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings on the surfaces of perishable items, edible coatings for extending the shelf life of perishable items, coatings for protecting perishable items from biotic or abiotic stressors; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products in order to improve the native functionality or properties of the surfaces, namely, to modify or improve the aesthetic appearance of the surfaces; soluble formulations which may be applied to surfaces of perishable items in order to passivate the surfaces from degradation by biotic stressors, molecular coatings for delaying ripening of produce; flower and plant preservatives, namely, solutions and soluble formulations that can be applied to pre-harvest plants and produce to naturally retard plant respiration and transpiration, and molecular coatings for extending the shelf life of cut flowers


 Mark Description: 
NOT AVAILABLE


 Type Of Mark: 
TradeMark


 Published For Opposition Date: 
5/31/2016


Last Applicant/Owner:

Apeel Technology, Inc.Goleta, CA  93117
Why is this contact information displayed?  

Why is this contact information displayed? [Close]
The USPTO makes this data available for search by the public so that individuals can locate ownership information for intellectual property, much the same way a county might make real estate property ownership information available.
Since our website is synchronized with the USPTO data, we recommend making any data changes with the USPTO directly. Our website will auto-update when the USPTO data is updated.
You may also contact Trademarkia to make a request for the removal of your personally identifiable information or trademark data.  Such requests must be made in writing and will be subject to verification of ownership.  This policy allows verified trademark owners to specify: (A) that their identifiable information be masked, or (B) that their trademark pages permanently deleted from Trademarkia.com.  
                                                Requests may be made directly to customer.service@trademarkia.com and every effort will be made to honor them within 48 hours. 
Click here for further details.
[Close]




 Mark Drawing Code:  
Standard Character Mark


 Design Search: 


(NO DATA)



Register Type:  
Principal


 Disclaimer:
 ("SCIENCES")


 Correspondent:


LISA GREENWALD-SWIRE
Fish & Richardson P C
500 Arguello St Ste 500
Redwood City, CA 94063-1568






 Intent to Use Trademark - Applicant has not submitted proof of use in commerce the the USPTO.





Classification Information



Primary Class: 
 Class (001) - Chemicals used in industry, science and photography, as well as in agriculture, horticulture and forestry; unprocessed artificial resins; unprocessed plastics; manures; fire extinguishing compositions; tempering and soldering preparations; chemical substances for preserving foodstuffs; tanning substances; adhesives used in industry. 


First Use Anywhere: 
Not provided


First Use In Commerce: 
Not provided





Trademarkia is the largest search engine for U.S. trademarks.  Each month hundreds of trademarks around the world are filed by licensed attorneys in the LegalForce/Trademarkia network! You can register your trademark in 170+ countries in the world through LegalForce Network.
 LegalForce Network can help you incorporate a business around your APEEL SCIENCES trademark in less than 5 minutes.  Trademarkia makes the process easy and convenient, so start now!
 Trademarkia.com is a free search engine of publicly available government records.  Trademarkia.com is not a law firm and does not represent owners & correspondents listed on this page.
Trademark Document Retrieval >>







Trademark - Apply Online!


100% Satisfaction Guarantee protect your valuable brand now.



How it works?
What you get?






1. Legalforce RAPC - #1 U.S. Trademark Filing from 2010 to now.
2. Describe how your business or product is being used. Register your mark in 176+ countries. Just $199 + govt fees! Start here >>






1. Top Global IP Attorneys - Credibility and Experience!
2. All processes will be performed in a timely manner. You will be informed periodically about the process.






Keep Track of this Brand.

 Trademark Watch Services
Keep track of how your trademark is being used. Available in the United States and in more than 176 countries. Round-the-clock monitoring. Monthly report on potential infringement.
                                

Watch this Trademark 

Trademark Watch Services read more...

Current Trademark Status:

6/29/2017
SECOND EXTENSION - GRANTED


Free Trademark Search:






Correspondent Search:



LISA GREENWALD-SWIRE


                                             
                                         is a correspondent of APEEL SCIENCES trademark. 
                            	    


Current Overall Rating:

 (0 review)
                            
What You Can Do:




Start Your Business



FREE Logo Creator



Add to Favorites



View Documents



FREE Trademark Search



Start Trademark Filing Process



Protect this Mark Internationally



Custom Logo Design $159



Search apeelsciences on popular social networks






                                Trademarkia lets you see how your 
                                personal name, product name, 
                                trademark name or username is being used on any of 530+ new 
                                and popular social networks.  
                                Be the first to reserve your name  and get help stopping others from using it - all in one place!















Trademark Oppose Service


You can request for Extension of Time to Oppose this mark or Oppose it now.



                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 







Status Update Alerts

Status Update Alerts are email updates of the latest trademark status change. Please make sure you provide the correct email. 


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password;
                 

                 - If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password.
                


* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



* 



 Please enter the value




 

  
                             



 









Review & Rating

Please Rate and Review for APEEL SCIENCES 




APEEL SCIENCES is providing Food preservatives, namely, soluble formulations and solutions of naturally occurring plant extracts for forming coatings on the surfaces of perishable items, edible coatings for extending the shelf life of perishable items, coatings for protecting perishable items from biotic or abiotic stressors; formulations and solutions which may be applied to surfaces of perishable products in order to improve the native functionality or properties of the surfaces, namely, to modify or improve the aesth....
                


                 - If you are new to LegalForce/Trademarkia, please just enter your contact email and create a password to be associated with your review.
                 

                 If you already have a LegalForce/Trademarkia account, please enter your account's email and password before posting your review.
                 


* Please Rate: 


     




* Your Review: 



 Please enter your review.



* Email Address: 


 Please enter your email address



* Enter Password: 


 Please enter your password



 

  
                             



 




















Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














APEEL TECHNOLOGY, INC., Patent Owner, GOLETA, CA, US























































Patent Buddy

Sign In     |     Join Today





















Free



Premium



Professional



Enterprise








Patent Searching

 

 

 



Technology Searching






Owner and Inventor Searching






Patent Analytics






Owner Analytics






Attorney Analytics






Inventor Analytics






Technology Analytics






Mobile Searching






Tagging






Advanced Patent Analytics

 

 

 



Advanced Owner Analytics






Mobile Portfolio/Analytics






Detailed Attorney Information






Prosecution analytics






Pre-publication Data






Monthly PAIR Information and Watches







						Number of patents in all portfolios
						
100 (maximum)
1000 (maximum)
2000 (maximum)
Unlimited


Follows
							in all categories (Watch)

						10 (maximum)
						
50 (maximum)
500 (maximum)
Unlimited


Maximum number of portfolios
5 (maximum)
10 (maximum)
100 (maximum)
Unlimited


Maximum number of comparisons
1 (maximum)
 
5 (maximum)
 
20 (maximum)
 
Unlimited










FREE

 

$9.95/mo

 

$39.95/mo

 

$99.95/mo



 
 
 
 
 
 



PAIR
									Watch Weekly Update
$2.75/mo/patent
$2.65/mo/patent


PAIR
									Watch Daily Update
$5.75/mo/patent
$5.55/mo/patent


Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now










Welcome to PatentBuddy 2.0!  Please enjoy the 30+ day free trial of our  level membership.  If you wish to continue with a paid membership, please select a membership plan before the year end expiration date.  Otherwise, all portfolios and followings will be reset to our free membership plan after the expiration date.






Free



Premium



Professional



Enterprise








Patent Searching

 

 

 



Technology Searching






Owner and Inventor Searching






Patent Analytics






Owner Analytics






Attorney Analytics






Inventor Analytics






Technology Analytics






Mobile Searching






Tagging






Advanced Patent Analytics

 

 

 



Advanced Owner Analytics






Mobile Portfolio/Analytics






Detailed Attorney Information






Prosecution analytics






Pre-publication Data






Monthly PAIR Information and Watches







						Number of patents in all portfolios
						
100 (maximum)
1000 (maximum)
2000 (maximum)
Unlimited


Follows
							in all categories (Watch)

						10 (maximum)
						
50 (maximum)
500 (maximum)
Unlimited


Maximum number of portfolios
5 (maximum)
10 (maximum)
100 (maximum)
Unlimited


Maximum number of comparisons
1 (maximum)
 
5 (maximum)
 
20 (maximum)
 
Unlimited










FREE

 

$9.95/mo

 

$39.95/mo

 

$99.95/mo



 
 
 
 
 
 



PAIR
									Watch Weekly Update
$2.75/mo/patent
$2.65/mo/patent


PAIR
									Watch Daily Update
$5.75/mo/patent
$5.55/mo/patent


Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now









Please Confirm Your Upgraded Plan Purchase By Selecting Upgrade Button

  Yearly (Get 12 months for the price of 11!)  MonthlyUPGRADECANCEL












Free



Premium



Professional



Enterprise








Patent Searching

 

 

 



Technology Searching






Owner and Inventor Searching






Patent Analytics






Owner Analytics






Attorney Analytics






Inventor Analytics






Technology Analytics






Mobile Searching






Tagging






Advanced Patent Analytics

 

 

 



Advanced Owner Analytics






Mobile Portfolio/Analytics






Detailed Attorney Information






Prosecution analytics






Pre-publication Data






Monthly PAIR Information and Watches







						Number of patents in all portfolios
						
100 (maximum)
1000 (maximum)
2000 (maximum)
Unlimited


Follows
							in all categories (Watch)

						10 (maximum)
						
50 (maximum)
500 (maximum)
Unlimited


Maximum number of portfolios
5 (maximum)
10 (maximum)
100 (maximum)
Unlimited


Maximum number of comparisons
1 (maximum)
 
5 (maximum)
 
20 (maximum)
 
Unlimited










FREE

 

$9.95/mo

 

$39.95/mo

 

$99.95/mo



 
 
 
 
 
 



PAIR
									Watch Weekly Update
$2.75/mo/patent
$2.65/mo/patent


PAIR
									Watch Daily Update
$5.75/mo/patent
$5.55/mo/patent


Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now

 
Upgrade Now










Please Confirm Your Upgraded Plan Purchase By Selecting Upgrade Button

  Yearly (Get 12 months for the price of 11!)  MonthlyUPGRADECANCEL

















false



APEEL TECHNOLOGY, INC.
Patent Owner







Follow
Compare
Add to Portfolio


Stats


								
							0 
								
							  US PATENTS IN FORCE


								
							3
								
							 
					 US APPLICATIONS PENDING


Mar 16, 2017
 most recent publication





Details


							
								
							0
							
					 Issued Patents

							
								
							0
							
					 Issued in last 3 years

							
								
							3
							
					 Published in last 3 years


 
								
							0
							
					 Total Citation Count

							
							
								
							Jul 29, 2013
							
					 Earliest Filing

							
								
							0
							
					 Expired/Abandoned/Withdrawn Patents




Patent Activity in the Last 10 Years





Technologies


back





Intl Class
Technology
Matters
Rank in Class





 

 


 A23B PRESERVING, e.g. BY CANNING, MEAT, FISH, EGGS, FRUIT, VEGETABLES, EDIBLE SEEDS; CHEMICAL RIPENING OF FRUIT OR VEGETABLES; THE PRESERVED, RIPENED, OR CANNED PRODUCTS 117 SubclassesTop Owners


 

 


 A23L FOODS, FOODSTUFFS, OR NON-ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES, NOT COVERED BY SUBCLASSES   A21D OR A23B-A23J; THEIR PREPARATION OR TREATMENT, e.g. COOKING, MODIFICATION OF NUTRITIVE QUALITIES, PHYSICAL TREATMENT 161 SubclassesTop Owners


 

 


 A23P SHAPING OR WORKING OF FOODSTUFFS, NOT FULLY COVERED BY A SINGLE OTHER SUBCLASS 115 SubclassesTop Owners


 

 


 B05B SPRAYING APPARATUS; ATOMISING APPARATUS; NOZZLES 157 SubclassesTop Owners


 

 


 B05D PROCESSES FOR APPLYING LIQUIDS OR OTHER FLUENT MATERIALS TO SURFACES, IN GENERAL 182 SubclassesTop Owners


 

 


 C09D COATING COMPOSITIONS, e.g. PAINTS, VARNISHES, LACQUERS; FILLING PASTES; CHEMICAL PAINT OR INK REMOVERS; INKS; CORRECTING FLUIDS; WOODSTAINS; PASTES OR SOLIDS FOR COLOURING OR PRINTING; USE OF MATERIALS THEREFOR 183 SubclassesTop Owners



Show Top 10
										…







Intl Class
Technology
Matters
Rank in Class









Top Patents (by citation)




Upgrade to the Premium Level to View Top Patents for this Owner.
Learn More







Recent Publications


Publication #
Title
Filing Date
Pub Date
Intl Class


2017/0073,532 Precursor compounds for molecular coatingsSep 15, 16Mar 16, 17[C09D]2017/0049,119 PLANT EXTRACT COMPOSITIONS AND METHODS OF PREPARATION THEREOFSep 01, 16Feb 23, 17[A23B, A23L]2015/0030,780 AGRICULTURAL SKIN GRAFTINGJul 29, 13Jan 29, 15[B05D, A23P, B05B]





Recent Patents



					
					No Recent Patents to Display
					
						




Expired/Abandoned/Withdrawn Patents



					
					No Patents to Display
					
						





Top Inventors for This Owner




Upgrade to the Premium Level to View Top Inventors for this Owner.
Learn More








Add Patents to Portfolio


  Existing Portfolios  Create New Portfolio


									Add Portfolio
								

 

User Portfolios

  
								You have not yet added any portfolios.
							

 
							OK
						
 





















We are sorry but your current selection exceeds the maximum number of comparisons () for this membership level. Upgrade to our  Level for up to -1 comparisons!












We are sorry but your current selection exceeds the maximum number of portfolios (0) for this membership level. Upgrade to our  Level for up to -1 portfolios!.


























Discover the top patent resource on the web.
Create a Patent Buddy account today and discover why over 250,000 people currently use Patent Buddy as a patent analytics resource.
Join TodayNo credit card required
Already have an account? Sign In ›







Note
The template below is formatted to ensure compatibility with our system.
							Provide tags with | separated like (tags1|tags2).

Mandatory Fields * - 'MatterType','AppType','Country','Title','SerialNo'.

Acceptable Date Format - 'MM/DD/YYYY'.

Acceptable Filing/App Types - 

Continuation/Divisional
Original
Paris Convention
PCT National
With Priority
EP Validation
Provisional Conversion
Reissue
Provisional
Foreign Extension

Acceptable Status - 

Pending
Abandoned
Unfiled
Expired
Granted

Acceptable Matter Types - 

Patent
Utility Model
Supplemental Protection Certificate
Design
Inventor Certificate
Plant
Statutory Invention Reg



Advertisement


  




Advertisement

Email Yourself the App Links



Advertisement






Advertisement





Advertisement





Recipient Email Address 


Send Email





Recipient Email Address 

Send Email



Comment 







Recipient Email Address 

Send Email






Success
E-mail has been sent successfully.




Failure
Some error occured while sending email. Please check e-mail and try again!








We are sorry but your current membership does not allow you access to this feature. Upgrade to our Premium Level to View Top Owners in Class/Subclass!



Learn More












View Full Site

	Copyright 2017 PatentBuddy.
Help | Advertise | Contact | Terms | Privacy | About Usfalse




